West Virginia, session 2025, HB3204.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Registration of Voters. §3-2-32. Unlawful registration or rejection of voter; penalties. (a) Any registrar or clerk of the county commission who knowingly registers or permits to be registered a person not lawfully entitled to be registered, or who knowingly refuses to register a person entitled to be registered, or who knowingly assists in preventing such person from being registered, or who inserts or intentionally permits to be inserted a name or other entry in any registration form or file, knowing or having reason to know that the entry should not be made, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1000 or confined in the county jail for not more than one year or both, in the discretion of the court.(b) Any person who registers or applies to be registered, or persuades or assists another to be registered, or who applies for a change of residence address, knowing or having reason to know that he or she is not entitled to be registered or to have his or her residence address changed on the registration record, or any person who declares an address known not to be his or her legal residence or who impersonates another in an application for registration, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $1000 or confined in the county jail for not more than one year, or both, in the discretion of the court.(c) The Secretary of State is required to provide for verification of voter residence at the physical address listed on their registration or to allow for the authorization of such by a third party.